src/morphology/phonology.twolc
"%{ЕØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{ЕØ%}:0  <=>  _ %^RmVow: ;
!! тяште+N+Pl+Nom+Def __star/tähti__
!!€ тяшть%{ЕØ%}%^RmVow%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ тяшт000%>0ть


"0:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 0:й <=> %> [ %{ИЫЙ%}:ы | %{ИЫЙ%}:и ] %> _  х т [ :ь ]  ;

"е:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 е:0 <=>  _  %> %{ИЫЙ%}: [ # | %- | %> [в о к|%{гк%}: %{АЕ%}:] | (%>)  х т  :ь |н | х т е|т]  ;
         [ Cns | Vows ] _  %> [%{АЯ%}:я|%{АЯ%}:а [ н | т ]|%{ВИУ%}:] ; 
!! веле+N+SP+Lat+Indef
!!€ веле%>%{ВИУ%}
!!€ вел0%>и
!!!!!

"е:о"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 е:о <=> Cns: _ %^Е2О: %> (%{АО%}:|%{Х%}:) Cns: ;

! CHECKME
"е:а"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 е:а <=> Cns: _ %^Е2А: %> (%{АО%}:|%{Х%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:) Cns: ;

"а:е"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 а:е <=> Cns: _ %^А2Е: %> ;

"а:о"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 а:о <=> Cns: _ %^А2О: %>  ;

"я:а"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 я:а <=>
 CnsNonDent: _ %^Я2А: %> [%{ЕОØ%}: [(н) ц| н т|н з|з %>| (н) к с] |%{вгк%}: %{АЕ%}:| %{Х%}: т %{ЬØ%}: [#|%-|%>]|ф т о м| д %{АО%}: |ш к а|с  [#|%-|%>]|с (т) %{АО%}: |%{ВИУ%}:|с н %{АО%}:] ;
! Cns: _ %^Я2А: %> ;
!!рьвя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: __wife__
!!€ рьвя%^Я2А%>%{ЕОØ%}нц
!!€ рьва0%>0нц

!!€ ава%>з%>%{ЕОØ%}нт
!!€ ава0з0онт


"%{АЕØ%}:а Always"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{АЕØ%}:а <= [Cns - [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й |в|д | л | з]] %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
 	      Cns [д | л | з]  %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ # | %- ]  ;

"%{АЕØ%}:а Sometimes"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{АЕØ%}:а => [Cns - [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й |в|д | л | з]] %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
              [д | л | з]  %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ # | %- ]  ;

"%{АЕØ%}:е Always"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{АЕØ%}:е <= [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й: |[Cns - [ д | л | з]] ь:] %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
 	      Cns [д | л | з] ь: %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ %> (%{Х%}:) Cns ]  ;
"%{АЕØ%}:е Sometimes"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{АЕØ%}:е => [ ш | ч | ж | щ | й: |[Cns - [ д | л | з]] ь:] %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              [д | л | з] ь: %> _  [ # | %- ] ;
              [ ш | ч | ж | щ ] _ [ %> (%{Х%}:) Cns ]  ;
!! мокша+N+Sg+Nom+Def: __Moksha__
!!€ мокш%{АЕØ%}%>сь
!!€ мокше%>сь

"%{АЕØ%}:0 Always"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{АЕØ%}:0 <=
    [ Vows | в ]  %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
    _ %> %{ВИУ%}: ;

"%{АЕØ%}:0 Sometimes"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{АЕØ%}:0 =>
    Vows ([ в | д | л | з] (ь:)) %> _ [ # | %- ]  ;
    _ %> %{ВИУ%}: ;


"%{АЕ%}:a"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{АЕ%}:а <=>
   [ [Vows - [и]] | NPC | %{ЬØ%}:0| ъ |:Vows - [:и]] (%>) [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:]  _ [ # | %- | %> ] ;
!! вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: __word/sana__
!!€ вал%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}#
!!€ вал%>га#
!! мельге+Pron+Prl+PxSg3: __after__
!!€ мельг%{АЕ%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%}
!!€ мельга%>0нза
!!$ мельг%{АЕ%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нз%{АО%}
!!$ мельге%>0нза
  [:Vows - [:и]] (%^Я2А:) %> %{вгк%}: _ [ # | %- | %> ] ;
!! вальмя+N+SP+Prl+Indef: __window/ikkuna__
!!€ вальмя%^Я2А%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ вальма0%>ва

   ь ф к _ %>  ;
!перьфке



"%{АЕ%}:е"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{АЕ%}:е <=> [ :ь| й] (%>) [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:] _ [ # | %- | %> ] ;
!! менель+N+SP+Prl+Indef __sky/taivas__
!!€ менель%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ менель%>ге
!!€ шяй%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ шяй%>ге
     и %> [%{вгк%}:|%{гк%}:|н г] _ [ # | %- | %> ] ;
!! аля+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Foc __father/isä__
!!€ аля%>%{ЕОØ%}з%>ти%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ аля%>0з%>ти%>ге
   [ч|ш|ж|ч] _ %> ;
   ь ф к _ [# | %- ] ;
!перьфке

"%{АЯ%}:ya"
!! __@RULENAME@__
%{АЯ%}:я <=>     [ CnsDent: [ я:0 | е:0 | ь: ]| й: | # Cns* [у|и]] %>  _  [ т | н ] ;
!!€ пань>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ пан00ян
!! тумс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1 __leave/lähteä__
!!€ ту>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ ту>ян

   [ CnsDentNoL ь: [ г: ] | ь: | е | й ] %> %{Х%}: т _ [ д | м | н ] ;
!!€ пань>%{Х%}т%{АЯ%}ма
!!€ пан000тяма
!!€ мярьг%>%{Х%}т%{АЯ%}ма
!!€ мярьк%>0тяма


"%{АЯ%}:a"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{АЯ%}:а <=> [ :BTV | LBC | CnsDent: ] %>  %{Х%}: т  _  [ д | н | м ] ;
    [[ CnsDent | CnsNonDent ] ( а:0 | о:0 )| %{ЕО%}:|%{АЕ%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:| %{АОØ%}:| %{АО%}: ] %>  _  [ т | н ] ;
!!€ канд>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ канд0ан
  щ е: %> _ [ т | н ] ;
!!€ аще%>%{АЯ%}н
!!€ ащ0%>ан



"j:0 LEFT"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
й:0 <= Vows _ [ %> %{ВИУ%}: | %>  %{АЕØ%}:| %>  %{ЕОØ%}:| %> %{ИЫЙ%}:и|   %> [%{АЯ%}:я | %{АО%}: [ :Cns | К3:0 | # | %- ]] ] ;
!!€ тий%>%{ЕОØ%}за
!!€ ти00еза
 Vows CnsAndSoft+  [и|ы] _ %> %{Х%}: т: ;
 т и [й: %> %{ИЫЙ%}: |и] _ %> %{Х%}: т: ;
!! седи+N+Pl+Nom+Indef __heart/sydän__
!!€ седий%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ седи0%>хть
 %{ИЫЙ%}: _ %> %{ЕОØ%}: ;
!! араламс+V+Der/NomAg+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: __protect/puolustaa__
!!€ арала%>%{ИЫЙ%}й%>%{ЕОØ%}ц
!!€ арала%>0й%>ец

"j:0 RIGHT"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
й:0 => Vows _ [ %> %{ВИУ%}:| %> %{ЕОØ%}: | %>  %{АЕØ%}:| %> %{ИЫЙ%}:и|   %> [%{АЯ%}:я | %{АО%}: [ :Cns | К3:0 | # | %- ]] ] ;
!!€ тий%>%{ЕОØ%}за
!!€ ти00еза

 Vows CnsAndSoft+  [и|ы] _ %> %{Х%}: т: ;
 т и [й: %> %{ИЫЙ%}: |и] _ %> %{Х%}: т: ;
!! седи+N+Pl+Nom+Indef __heart/sydän__
!!€ седий%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ седи0%>хть
 %{ИЫЙ%}: _ %> %{ЕОØ%}: ;

!"й:х"
!! __@RULENAME@__
!й:х <=>
    _ %> %{Х%}: т %{АЯ%}: [ м|д] а ;
! CHECKME 2017-03-07


!
!18.04.2007 Adding "U2:" and contemplating environment "%> т н _"
!
"ye:e always"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{еэ%}:э <=
          CnsDent (%{АО%}:0) %>  н _ [[ # | %-|%> %{гк%}:0 а:я]| н ь: | к] ;
!          [[[Back - [:* Vows]] %>| CnsDent]  %> ] т: н _ [ # | %- |%> [%{гк%}:0 а:я |т| л|%{вгк%}:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];


"ye:e sometimes"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{еэ%}:э =>
          [CnsDent|CnsNonDent] ( %{АО%}:0 ) %>  н _ [[ # | %-|%> %{гк%}:0 а:я]|н ь:|к ] ;
!          [ CnsDent | CnsNonDent | м:0 ]  ( %{АО%}:0 | %{АОØ%}:0 ) %> ( VLoss:0 ) ( TLoss:0 ) т: н _ [ # | %- | %> [%{гк%}:0 а:я | т | л | %{вгк%}:в а | в | д | к | н | с | ш ]];


"a:ya"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
а:я  <=> :Vows ((%>) К3:0 )  %> %{гк%}:0 _  ;


!! !CONSONANT CHANGES
" %{Х%}:0 after vowel"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{Х%}:0 <=> [ :Vows (%^Е2О:|%^А2О:) |з:|ж:| т ( ь: ) | к |г:| с | ш | ц | м:|в: | п | ч | х | щ | ф | н: ( ь: ) | д: ( ь: ) | г:к ] %> _ ;
	 [ з:|ж:| т ( ь: ) | к |г:| с | ш | ц | п | ч | х | щ | ф | м: |в: | н: ( ь: ) | д: ( ь: ) | г:к ] [%{ЕОØ%}:|%{ЕØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow: %> _ ;
!! валда+N+Pl+Nom+Def __light/valo__
!!€ валд%{АОØ%}%^RmVow%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ валт00%>0т0


" %{Х%}:х after some consonants"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{Х%}:х <=> [ р | л | й: ] ( ь: )  %> _ ;
!! ваны+N+Pl+Nom+Def __watcher/katsoja__
!!€ ваный%>%{Х%}тне
!!€ ваны0%>х0не

"м:п ям"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
м:п <=> _  ( ь: | %{АОØ%}: (%^RmVow:)) %> %{Х%}: [ т: | %{КТ%}: ]  ;
!!€ ям%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ яп%>0т0

"в:ф ям"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
в:ф <=> _  ( ь: ) %> %{Х%}: [ т: | %{КТ%}: ]  ;
!!€ кев%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кеф%>0т0

"н:т окун"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
н:т <=> _  ( ь: ) %> %{Х%}: [ т: | %{КТ%}: ]  ;

!2016.QQ
!Ablative d/t
"d:t"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
д:т  <=> [ CnsVoiceless | д: | г] (ь:) (%{ЕОØ%}: %^RmVow:|%{АОØ%}: %^RmVow:)  %> _ [ %{АО%}: ] ;
!__д:т од:оттне definite plural__
          _ (ь:)  [([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> [ %{Х%}: [ т: н е | т я | т %{АЯ%}: | т %{ЬØ%}: ] | %{КТ%}: | к | ф]| %^Devoice: | %> д: %{АО%}: ] ;
!! офта+N+SP+Abl+Indef
!!€ офт%{АОØ%}%^RmVow%>д%{АО%}
!!€ офт00%>та
!!$ офт%{АОØ%}%^RmVow%>д%{АО%}
!!$ офт00%>да
!! кядь+N+SP+Abl+Indef: __hand;arm/käsi
!!€ кядь%>д%{АО%}
!!€ кять%>та
!! кандомс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2
!!€ канд%>%{Х%}тя
!!€ кант%>0тя
!!€ канд>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кант%>0т0
!!€ лемдь%>%^Devoice%>ф
!!€ лемть%>0%>ф
!!€ пильг%{ЕОØ%}%^RmVow%>д%{АО%}
!!€ пильг00%>та


"З:С"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 з:с <=> Vows _ (ь:) [%^Devoice: %^Ь2ZERO: |([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> %{Х%}:] ;
!! изь+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:	__they did not__
!!€ изь%^Devoice%^Ь2ZERO%>ть
!!€ ис000%>ть
  Vows _ (ь:) %{DIM%}: ;


"Ж:Ш"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 ж:ш <=> Vows _ (ь:) [%^Devoice:|([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> %{Х%}:] ;

"ж:ч панчсь"
!! __@RULENAME@__
ж:ч <=> н _  %> [ с | т | ф ]  ;
!!€ панж%>сь
!!€ панч%>сь


"г:к"
!! __@RULENAME@__
г:к <=>
!"д:т од:оттне definite plural"
          _ ([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:)  %> [ %{Х%}: [ т: н е | т я | т %{АЯ%}: | т %{ЬØ%}:| %{КТ%}: ] | %{КТ%}: | к | ф ];
!!€ мярьг%>%{Х%}т%{АЯ%}ма
!!€ мярьк%>0тяма
! WHAT IS THIS      CnsVoiceless (ь) %> _ %{АЕØ%}: [# | %- ] ;



"с:ц ломань:ломанць"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
с:ц <=> н ( ь: ) %> _ [ (т) ь | а | ы | ( т ) %{АО%}: | н | %> | # | %- ] ;

!Changes in suffix consonants

!!!Depricated due to 
!!ERROR: Label not found in 'EQV_LABELS' (114) **
!!Solved in several contexts by declaring both lexical
!!and surface forms in the alphabet.
"G1:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{гк%}:0 <=> [ [:Vows - [:и]] ((%>) К3:0 )  %> | К1: %{ЬØ%}:0 %> KLoss:0 | :к %> KLoss:0 ] _ а: ;


"G1:g"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{гк%}:г <=> [CnsVoicedDent (:ь|%{ЬØ%}:0)| й | и | [ CnsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь )] %> _ [ а|%{АЕ%}:] ;
!! вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc __word/sana__
!!€ вал%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ вал%>га
!! аля+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2+Foc __father/isä__
!!€ аля%>цти%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ аля%>цти%>ге

"G1:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{гк%}:к <=>  [ CnsVoicelessDent ( :ь | %{ЬØ%}:0 | %{ЬØ%}:ь ) | CnsVoicelessNonDent | г | т %{ЬØ%}: | К1: %{ЬØ%}: | К4:0 ] :0* %> _ [а|%{АЕ%}:]  ;
!! вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc __word/sana__
!!€ вал%>с%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ вал%>с%>ка
!! офто+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc
!!€ офт%{АОØ%}%>д%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нт%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ офто%>до%>0нт%>ка
!! ава+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc
!!€ тядя%>ст%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нт%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ тядя%>сто%>0нт%>ка

!Lative
"%{ВИУ%}:v"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{ВИУ%}:в <=> [а | я] %> _ ;

!Lative
"%{ВИУ%}:i"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{ВИУ%}:и <=> [е: | ь: | и:] (%^Ь2ZERO:) %> _ ;
                Vow й: %> _ ;
!! учительскай+N+SP+Lat+Indef:
!!€ учительскай%>%{ВИУ%}
!!€ учительска0%>и

!Lative
"%{ВИУ%}:u"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{ВИУ%}:у <=> [NPC (%{АОØ%}: %^RmVow: )|%{АЕØ%}:] %> _ ;
!! уша+N+SP+Lat+Indef: __outdoors__
!!€ уш%{АЕØ%}%>%{ВИУ%}
!!€ уше%>у

!Prolative
"G2:g"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{вгк%}:г <=> [ CnsVoicedDent ( :ь )|и| [ CnsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь ) ] %> _ %{АЕ%}: ;

"G2:v"! 
%{вгк%}:в <=>  [:Vows - :и] (%^Я2А:) %>  _ %{АЕ%}: ;
!! вальмя+N+SP+Prl+Indef
!!€ вальмя%^Я2А%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ вальма0%>ва


"G2:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{вгк%}:к <=>  [ CnsVoicelessDent ( :ь )| CnsVoicelessNonDent ( :ь )| г ] %> _ %{АЕ%}: ;

! 2012-08-07
"G4:g" !Imperative Clitics
Г4:г  <=> з ь %> _ а ;



"G4:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Г4:0  <=>
           [ К1: %{ЬØ%}: | к ] %> _ а ;
  [%{АО%}: ] %> _ а: ;

"G4:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
Г4:к  <=>  # [и л я|у ж о|а з ё|а д я|а й д а] %> _ а  ;


"m:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
м:0 <=> 
 BTV  _ %{АОØ%}:0  %>  %^RmVow: [ т| т н е ] ;



!2016.QQ
!! !imperative suffix
"К1 %{КТ%}:t left"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{КТ%}:т <= [ Vow н: | CnsVoiceless ] ( ь: ) %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
!!€ пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пан0%>ть

"К1 %{КТ%}:t right"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{КТ%}:т =>  [ н: | CnsVoiceless | д: ] ( ь: ) %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
!!€ канд>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кант00т0
!!€ пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пан0%>ть

!2016.QQ
"К1 %{КТ%}:к left"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{КТ%}:к <=  [ Vows ] %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
! %> %{Х%}: [ т | %{КТ%}: ] 
!!€ кунда>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кунда00к0

"К1 %{КТ%}:к right"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 %{КТ%}:к =>  [ Vows | д: ( ь: ) ] %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
! %> %{Х%}: [ т | %{КТ%}: ] 
!!€ кунда>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кунда00к0

"К1 %{КТ%}:0 "
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{КТ%}:0 <=>  г: %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
!! кельгомс+V+TV+ConNegII:
!!€ кельг>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кельк%>00

!2016.QQ
! Suffix final hard vs soft
"%{ЬØ%}:ь"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
%{ЬØ%}:ь <=> [ ь:|й:] ([%{ЕØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> (%{Х%}:) [ т: | %{КТ%}: ] _ ;

!!€ пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пан0%>ть
!2016.QQ

!! Plural before definite plural following a consonant
"t:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
т:0 <=>
[б:|в:|ж:|з: ( ь: )| й: |г:|к| л ( ь: ) |м: |п| р ( ь: ) |с ( ь: ) |ф|х|ц ( ь: ) |ч|ш|щ] ([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> %{Х%}: _ н е ;
!! Ананьина К.И. 2000: 55
!!€ ава%>%{Х%}тне
!!€ ава%>0тне
!!€ шуфт%>%{Х%}тне
!!€ шуфт%>0тне
!!€ нармот0%>0тне
!!€ лав%>%{Х%}тне
!!€ лаф%>00не
!!$ лав%>%{Х%}тне
!!$ лаф%>0тне

![б:|д: ( ь: ) |ж:|з: ( ь: )| й |г:|к| л ( ь: ) |м:|н: ( ь: ) |п| р ( ь: ) |с ( ь: ) |т ( ь: ) |ф|х|ц ( ь: ) |ч|ш|щ] %> %{Х%}: _ н е ;

!!SLoss s s > s = s 0 0 s
"s:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
с:0 <=> с _ %> SLoss:0 с ;

!!€ класс%>SLossс
!!€ клас000с
!2016.03!




!Word final Vowels
